Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4325
Bonds; negotiable; sale.

(1) Except as the issuing risk management pool's board of directors may otherwise provide, any bond and any interest coupons thereto attached shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all purposes of article 8, Uniform Commercial Code.

(2) The bonds may be sold at public or private sale as the issuing risk management pool's board of directors may provide and at such price or prices as such board shall determine.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 25.